Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 9 Blasting or Excavating Near Underground Facilities
25-9-7.
Determining whether underground facilities are present; information to UPC; noncompliance; future underground facilities; abandoned underground facilities.

Prior to 7:00 A.M. on the effective date, each facility owner or operator shall determine whether or not underground facilities are located on the tract or parcel of land upon which the blasting or excavating is to occur. If underground facilities are determined to be present, the facility owner or operator shall designate, through stakes, flags, permanent markers, or other marks on the surface of the tract or parcel of land, the location of such underground facilities. This subsection shall not apply to large projects.

Designation of the location of underground facilities through staking, flagging, permanent markers, or other marking shall be in accordance with the American Public Works Association (APWA) color code in place at the time the location of the underground facility is designated. Additional marking requirements beyond color code, if any, shall be prescribed by rules and regulations promulgated by the commission.

A facility owner or operator is not required to mark its own facilities pursuant to the time frame set out in paragraph (1) of this subsection if the facility owner or operator or its agents are the only parties performing the excavation; however, such facilities shall be designated prior to the actual start of excavation.

Prior to 7:00 A.M. on the effective date indicated in a locate request submitted in accordance with Code Section 25-9-6, each sewer system owner or operator shall determine whether sewer laterals are located or likely to be located on the tract or parcel of land upon which the blasting or excavating is to occur. If sewer laterals are determined to be present or likely to be present, then the sewer system owner or operator shall assist in designating sewer laterals up to the edge of the public right of way. Such assistance shall not constitute ownership or operation of the sewer lateral by the sewer system owner or operator. Good faith compliance with provisions of this subsection in response to a locate request shall constitute full compliance with this chapter, and no person shall be found liable to any party for damages or injuries as a result of performing in compliance with the requirements of this subsection.

To assist in designating sewer laterals, the sewer system owner or operator shall provide its best available information regarding the location of the sewer laterals to the excavator. Such information shall be conveyed to the excavator in a manner that may include, but shall not be limited to, any one of the following methods:

Marking the location of sewer laterals in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, provided that:

Any sewer lateral designated using the best available information shall constitute a good faith attempt and shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subsection, provided that such mark represents only the best available information of the sewer system owner or operator and may not be accurate; and

If a sewer lateral is unlocatable, a triangular green mark shall be placed at the sewer main pointing at the address in question to indicate the presence of an unlocatable sewer lateral;

Providing electronic copies of or delivering the records through facsimile or by other means to an agreed upon location within 48 hours beginning the next business day following receipt by the UPC of the locate request submitted in accordance with Code Section 25-9-6, excluding hours during days other than business days; provided, however, that for local governing authorities that receive fewer than 50 locate requests annually, the local governing authority may designate the agreed upon location and communicate such designation to the excavator;

Arranging to meet the excavator on site to provide the best available information about the location of the sewer laterals;

Providing the records through other processes and to other locations approved by documented agreement between the excavator and the facility owner or operator; or

Any other reasonable means of conveyance approved by the commission after receiving recommendations from the advisory committee, provided that such means are equivalent to or exceed the provisions of subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph.

Each facility owner or operator, either upon determining that no underground facility or sewer lateral is present on the tract or parcel of land or upon completion of the designation of the location of any underground facilities or sewer laterals on the tract or parcel of land as required by subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, shall provide such information to the UPC in accordance with procedures developed by the UPC, which may include the use of the PRIS. In no event shall such information be provided later than midnight of the business day prior to the effective date of the locate request submitted in accordance with Code Section 25-9-6.

In the event the facility owner or operator is unable to designate the location of the underground facilities or sewer laterals due to extraordinary circumstances, such facility owner or operator shall notify the UPC and provide an estimated completion date in accordance with procedures developed by the UPC, which may include the use of the PRIS. The UPC shall also have the ability to declare extraordinary circumstances on behalf of any or all operators if the UPC is unable to transmit locate requests as required by this statute.

If, at the end of the time period specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, any facility owner or operator has not complied with the requirements of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section, as applicable, the UPC shall issue a second request to each such facility owner or operator. If the facility owner or operator does not respond to such second request by 12:00 Noon of that business day, either by notifying the UPC in accordance with procedures developed by the UPC that no underground facilities or sewer laterals are present on the tract or parcel of land, or by designating the location of such underground facilities or sewer laterals in accordance with the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, as applicable, then the person that submitted the locate request pursuant to Code Section 25-9-6 may proceed with the blasting or excavating, provided that there is no visible and obvious evidence of the presence of an unmarked underground facility or sewer lateral on the tract or parcel of land. Such person shall not be subject to any liability resulting from damage to the underground facility or sewer lateral as a result of the blasting or excavating, provided that such person complies with the requirements of Code Section 25-9-8.

If visible and obvious evidence of the presence of an unmarked underground facility or sewer lateral does exist and the facility owner or operator either refuses to comply with subsections (a) through (d) of this Code section, as applicable, or is not a member of the UPC, then the excavator shall attempt to designate such facility or sewer lateral prior to excavating. The facility owner or operator shall be strictly liable for the actual costs associated with the excavator designating such underground facilities and sewer laterals and any associated downtime. Such costs shall not exceed $100.00 or documented actual costs, whichever is greater, for each locate request.

All underground facilities installed by facility owners or operators on or after January 1, 2001, shall be installed in a manner which will make them locatable using a generally accepted electronic locating method. All sewer laterals installed on or after January 1, 2006, shall be installed in a manner which will make them locatable by facility owners or operators using a generally accepted electronic locating method. In the event that an unlocatable underground facility or unlocatable sewer lateral becomes exposed when the facility owner or operator is present or in the case of sewer laterals when the underground sewer owner or operator is present on or after January 1, 2006, such underground facility or sewer lateral shall be made locatable through the use of a permanent marker or an updating of permanent records.

Facility owners or operators shall either maintain recorded information concerning the location and other characteristics of abandoned underground facilities, maintain such abandoned underground facilities in a locatable manner, or remove such abandoned underground facilities. Facility owners or operators shall provide information on abandoned underground facilities, when possible, in response to a locate request or design locate request. When the presence of an abandoned underground facility within an excavation site is known, the facility owner or operator should attempt to designate the abandoned underground facility or provide information to the excavator regarding such facilities. When located or exposed, all abandoned underground facilities and sewer laterals shall be treated as live underground facilities and sewer laterals.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a facility owner or operator may use a locator to designate any or all underground facilities and sewer laterals. The use of a locator shall not relieve the facility owner or operator of any responsibility under this chapter. However, by contract a facility owner or operator may be indemnified by a locator for any failure on the part of the locator to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

Large project rules shall be promulgated by the commission. These rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, the establishment of detailed processes. Such rules may also include changes in the time period allowed for a facility owner or operator to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the time period for which designations are valid.

Within the notice period of the locate request submitted in accordance with Code Section 25-9-6, excluding hours during days other than business days, each facility owner or operator shall determine whether or not unlocatable facilities other than sewer laterals are present. In the event that such facilities are determined to be present, the facility owner or operator shall exercise reasonable care in locating such facilities. The exercise of reasonable care shall require, at a minimum, the use of the best available information to designate the facilities and notification to the UPC of such attempted location. Placing markers or otherwise leaving evidence of locations of facilities is deemed to be an acceptable form of notification to the excavator or locator.

This subsection shall not apply to sewer laterals.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 6; Ga. L. 1975, p. 417, § 4; Code 1981, §

25-9-6

; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 6/SB 274; Ga. L. 2014, p. 652, § 4/SB 117; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “after the business day” following “business day” throughout this Code section; in the second sentence of subsection (f), inserted “strictly” and added “and any associated downtime” at the end; substituted “designate” for “locate and mark” in the third sentence of subsection (h); and substituted the present provisions of subsection (j) for the former provisions, which read: “By January 1, 2006, the advisory committee shall propose to the Public Service Commission rules and processes specific to the locating of large projects. These rules shall include, but shall not be limited to, the establishment of detailed processes. Such rules may also include changes in the time period allowed for a facility owner or operator to comply with the provisions of this chapter and to the time period for which designations are valid. The commission shall promulgate rules addressing this subsection no later than June 1, 2006.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “underground” for “utility” throughout this Code section; in paragraph (a)(1), substituted “Prior to 7:00 A.M. on the effective date,” for “Within 48 hours beginning the next business day following receipt by the UPC of the locate request filed in accordance with Code Section 25-9-6, excluding hours during days other than business days,” at the beginning of the first sentence and inserted “such” in the second sentence; substituted “blasting or excavating” for “excavating or blasting” in the first sentences of paragraphs (a)(1) and (b)(1), and in the second sentence in subsection (e); substituted “commission” for “Public Service Commission” at the end of paragraph (a)(2) and in subsection (j); substituted “pursuant to the time frame set out in paragraph (1) of this subsection” for “within 48 hours” in paragraph (a)(3); in paragraph (b)(1), substituted “Prior to 7:00 A.M. on the effective date indicated in a locate request submitted in accordance with Code Section 25-9-6,” for “Within 48 hours beginning the next business day following receipt by the UPC of the locate request filed in accordance with Code Section 25-9-6, excluding hours during days other than business days,” at the beginning, and “whether sewer” for “whether or not sewer”; substituted “Such” for “This” at the beginning of the second sentence in the introductory language of paragraph (b)(2); substituted “submitted” for “filed” in subparagraph (b)(2)(B); in subsection (c), substituted “provide such” for “provide this” in the first sentence and “information” for “notice” and “business day prior to the effective date of the locate request submitted” for “second business day following receipt by the UPC of actual notice filed” in the second sentence; in subsection (d), substituted “circumstances, such” for “circumstances, the” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; substituted “such second” for “this additional” and “that submitted the locate request” for “providing notice” in the second sentence in subsection (e); substituted “underground sewer” for “sewer utility” in the second sentence in subsection (g); and substituted “the notice period of the locate request submitted” for “48 hours beginning the next business day following receipt by the UPC of the locate request filed” in the first sentence of paragraph (k)(1).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly provided for treatment to be given gas pipes and facilities by persons undertaking blasting or excavating. Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered the former Code section as Code Section 25-9-8.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered former Code Section 25-9-6 as this Code section.

25-9-8.
Treatment of underground facilities by blasters and excavators; emergency notifications.

Persons engaged in blasting or in excavating with mechanized excavating equipment shall not strike, damage, injure, or loosen any underground facility or sewer lateral which has been staked, flagged, or marked in accordance with this chapter.

When blasting or excavating is to take place within the tolerance zone, the excavator shall exercise reasonable care for the protection of the underground facility or sewer lateral, including permanent markers and paint placed to designate underground facilities. Such protection shall include, but shall not be limited to, at least one of the following based on geographical and climate conditions: hand digging, pot holing, soft digging, vacuum excavation methods, pneumatic hand tools, or other technical methods that may be developed. Other mechanical methods may be used with the approval of the facility owner or operator.

If the precise location of the underground facilities cannot be determined by the excavator, the facility owner or operator thereof shall be notified by the excavator so that the operator and the excavator shall work together to determine the precise location of the underground facilities prior to continuing the excavation.

When conducting trenchless excavation the excavator shall exercise reasonable care, as described in subsection (b) of this Code section, and shall take additional care to attempt to prevent damage to underground facilities and sewer laterals. The advisory committee may recommend to the commission more stringent criteria as it deems necessary to define additional care. The commission is authorized to adopt additional criteria to define additional care.

Any person engaged in blasting or in excavating with mechanized excavating equipment that strikes, damages, injures, or loosens any underground facility or sewer lateral, regardless as to whether the underground facility or sewer lateral is marked, shall immediately cease such blasting or excavating and notify the UPC and the appropriate facility owner or operator, if known. Upon receiving such notification from the excavator or the UPC, the facility owner or operator shall send personnel to the location as soon as possible to effect temporary or permanent repair of such damage. Until such time as the damage has been repaired, no person shall engage in blasting or excavating activities that may cause further damage to the underground facility or sewer lateral except as provided in Code Section 25-9-12.

The excavator shall make an emergency 9-1-1 call to alert emergency services upon striking or damaging an underground facility that carries:

Gas as defined in 49 C.F.R. Parts 192 and 193; or

Hazardous liquid as defined in 49 C.F.R. Part 195.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 7; Code 1981, §

25-9-7

; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 7/SB 274; Ga. L. 2014, p. 652, § 5/SB 117; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, rewrote subsection (b); added present subsection (c); and redesignated former subsections (c) and (d) as present subsections (d) and (e), respectively.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “underground” for “utility” throughout this Code section; substituted “blasting or excavating” for “excavating or blasting” in the first sentence in subsection (b) and the last sentence in subsection (e); in subsection (b), substituted “Such” for “This” at the beginning of the second sentence and inserted “shall” preceding “not” in the second sentence; in subsection (d), substituted “shall exercise” for “must exercise” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The recommendations of the HDD consortium applicable to the performance of trenchless excavation set out in the document ‘Horizontal Directional Drilling Good Practice Guidelines,’ dated May, 2001, are adopted by reference as a part of this subsection to describe such additional care.” and separated the former last sentence into the present last two sentences; in subsection (e), substituted “that” for “who”, and “as to” for “of” in the first sentence, and substituted “such notification” for “notice” and “such damage” for “the damage” in the second sentence; and added subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly provided for the degree of accuracy required of gas companies in providing pipe location and for the apportionment of liability for inaccurate information. Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered the former Code section as Code Section 25-9-9.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered former Code Section 25-9-7 as this Code section.

25-9-9.
Degree of accuracy required in underground facility location information; effect of inaccurate information on liability of blaster or excavator; liability of facility owners for losses resulting from lack of accurate information.

For the purposes of this chapter, the location of underground facilities provided by a facility owner or operator in accordance with subsection (a) of Code Section 25-9-7 to any person engaging in scheduled blasting and excavating shall be accurate to within 18 inches, measured horizontally from the outer edge of either side of such underground facilities. If any underground facility becomes damaged by an excavator due to the furnishing of inaccurate information as to its location by the facility owner or operator, the excavator shall not be subject to any liability resulting from damage to the underground facility as a result of the blasting or excavating, provided that such person engaging in scheduled blasting or excavating complies with the requirements of Code Section 25-9-8 and there is no visible and obvious evidence to the excavator of the presence of a mismarked underground facility.

Upon documented evidence that the person seeking information as to the location of underground facilities has incurred losses or expenses due to inaccurate information, lack of information, or unreasonable delays in supplying information by the facility owners or operators, such facility owners or operators shall be liable to such person for any such losses or expenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 417, § 5; Code 1981, §

25-9-8

; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 8/SB 274; Ga. L. 2014, p. 652, § 6/SB 117; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “18 inches” for “24 inches” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (a).

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “underground” for “utility” throughout this Code section; in subsection (a), deleted “which is”, substituted “engaging in scheduled blasting and excavating shall” for “must”, and inserted a comma following “inches” in the first sentence, and, in the second sentence, substituted “the excavator” for “such excavator” and inserted “engaging in scheduled blasting or excavating”; and, in subsection (b), substituted “such facility” for “the facility” and “such person” for “that person”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “its” was substituted for “their” in the second sentence in subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly provided for the effect of this chapter on the rights, duties, etc. of gas companies. Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered the former Code section as Code Section 25-9-10.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered former Code Section 25-9-8 as this Code section.

25-9-10.
Effect of chapter upon rights, titles, powers, or interests of facility owners or operators.

This chapter does not affect and is not intended to affect any right, title, power, or interest that any facility owner or operator may have with relation to any underground facility or to any easement, right of way, license, permit, or other interest in or with respect to the land on which the underground facility is located.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 8; Code 1981, §

25-9-9

; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “that” for “which”, and “underground” for “utility” twice.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly provided for the effect of this chapter on local and state government rights, duties, etc. as to facilities on public right of ways. Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered the former Code section as Code Section 25-9-11.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered former Code Section 25-9-9 as this Code section.

25-9-10.1.
Cooperation with the Department of Transportation.

On and after July 1, 2023, the Department of Transportation shall participate in and cooperate with the UPC for purposes of receiving locate requests in the Department of Transportation’s right of way for underground facilities following a process consistent with Code Sections 25-9-6, 25-9-7, and 25-9-8 and subsection (a) of Code Section 25-9-9.

The Department of Transportation shall not be subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-9-9 or the enforcement provisions of subsections (h) and (i) of Code Section 25-9-14.

The Department of Transportation shall not participate in the funding of the UPC or its activities.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to deem the Department of Transportation to be a utility owner or a utility provider.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-9-10.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

Effective date.

This Code section becomes effective September 1, 2022.

25-9-11.
Effect of chapter upon rights, powers, etc., of state, counties, or municipalities concerning facilities located on public road or street rights of way.

This chapter does not affect and is not intended to affect any rights, powers, interest, or liability of the state or the Department of Transportation with respect to the state highway system, the county road system, or the municipal street system, or of a county with respect to the county road system or of a municipality with respect to the city street system, with relation to any underground facility which is or may be installed within the limits of any public road or street right of way, whether the installation is by written or verbal permit, easement, or any form of agreement whatsoever.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1659, § 4; Code 1981, §

25-9-10

; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “underground” for “utility” in the middle of this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly provided for the applicability of this chapter in the event of an emergency. Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered the former Code section as Code Section 25-9-12.

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered former Code Section 25-9-10 as this Code section.

25-9-11.1.
Local governing authorities prohibited from enforcing ordinances or resolutions imposing fines for violations of certain marking or location requirements.

No local governing authority shall enforce any ordinance or resolution which imposes fines for a violation of a local ordinance or resolution that establishes requirements for white lining, marking of underground facilities, re-marking of underground facilities, or otherwise locating underground facilities or sewer laterals for any locate request or large project.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-9-11.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 239, § 2/SB 191; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, substituted “underground” for “utility” three times.

25-9-12.
Notice requirements for emergency excavations.

The appropriate notice requirements prescribed by Code Section 25-9-6 shall not be required of persons performing emergency excavations; provided, however, that any person that engages in an emergency excavation shall take all reasonable precautions to avoid or minimize damage to any existing underground facilities and sewer laterals; provided, further, that any person that engages in an emergency excavation shall give notification of such emergency excavation as soon as practical to the UPC. In giving such notification, such person shall specifically identify the dangerous condition involved. If it is later determined that the excavation did not qualify as an emergency excavation, all liabilities and penalties will accrue as if no notification had been given.

History.

Ga. L. 1970, p. 226, § 4; Code 1981, §

25-9-11

; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 805, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1142, § 9/SB 274; Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

The 2022 amendment,

effective September 1, 2022, rewrote this Code section, which read: “The notice requirements provided by Code Section 25-9-6 shall not be required of persons performing emergency excavations or excavation in extraordinary circumstances; provided, however, that any person who engages in an emergency excavation or excavation in extraordinary circumstances shall take all reasonable precautions to avoid or minimize damage to any existing utility facilities and sewer laterals; provided, further, that any person who engages in an emergency excavation or excavation in extraordinary circumstances shall give notice of the emergency excavation as soon as practical to the UPC. In giving such notice, such person must specifically identify the dangerous condition involved. If it is later determined that the excavation did not qualify as an emergency excavation, all liabilities and penalties will accrue as if no notice had been given.”.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly provided for penalties for violations of this Code section. Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect repealed the former Code section and enacted Code Section 25-9-13 (now Code Section 25-9-14) on the same subject, effective July 1, 1986. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1969, p. 50, § 9; Ga. L. 1970, p. 226, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1659, § 2; and Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act).

Ga. L. 1986, p. 1069, § 1 in effect renumbered former Code Section 25-9-11 as this Code section.

25-9-13.
Appropriate notice required.

The appropriate notice requirements prescribed by Code Section 25-9-6 shall be required of persons performing nonemergency excavations in an area where one or more facility owners or operators has declared extraordinary circumstances in accordance with subsection (d) of Code Section 25-9-7. When a situation of extraordinary circumstances has been declared, the excavator shall be responsible for securing knowledge of the PRIS status of all facility owners or operators in the area to be excavated, as not all facility owners or operators may have declared extraordinary circumstances. Once the PRIS status of all facility owners or operators is known, excavation may commence in accordance with the requirements of subsection (e) of Code Section 25-9-7. If there is visible and obvious evidence of the presence of an unmarked underground facility or sewer lateral of a facility owner or operator that has declared extraordinary circumstances, the excavator shall exercise reasonable care for the protection of such underground facilities and sewer laterals when excavating.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372.

Effective date.

This Code section becomes effective September 1, 2022.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 325, § 1/HB 1372, redesignated former Code Section 25-9-13 as present Code Section 25-9-14.

25-9-13.
[Renumbered] Penalties for violations of chapter; bonds; enforcement; advisory committee; dispose of settlement recommendations.